Utah statutes.
46-4-501.   Creation and retention of electronic records and conversion of
written records by governmental agencies.
(1)  A state governmental agency may, by following the procedures and
requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make
rules that:
(a)  identify specific transactions that the agency is willing to conduct by
electronic means;
(b)  identify specific transactions that the agency will never conduct by
electronic means;
(c)  specify the manner and format in which electronic records must be
created, generated, sent, communicated, received, and stored, and the systems
established for those purposes;
(d)  if law or rule requires that the electronic records must be signed by
electronic means, specify the type of electronic signature required, the
manner and format in which the electronic signature must be affixed to the
electronic record, and the identity of, or criteria that must be met, by any
third party used by a person filing a document to facilitate the process;
(e)  specify control processes and procedures as appropriate to ensure
adequate preservation, disposition, integrity, security, confidentiality, and
auditability of electronic records; and
(f)  identify any other required attributes for electronic records that are
specified for corresponding nonelectronic records or that are reasonably
necessary under the circumstances.
(2)  A state governmental agency that makes rules under this section shall
submit copies of those rules, and any amendments to those rules, to:
(a)  the chief information officer established by Section 63F-1-201; and
(b)  the Utah Technology Commission established by Section 63D-1a-201.
(3) (a)  The chief information officer may prepare model rules and standards
relating to electronic transactions that encourage and promote consistency and
interoperability with similar requirements adopted by other Utah government
agencies, other states, the federal government, and nongovernmental persons
interacting with Utah governmental agencies.
(b)  In preparing those model rules and standards, the chief information
officer may specify different levels of standards from which governmental
agencies may choose in order to implement the most appropriate standard for a
particular application.
(c)  Before submitting any model rules or standards to state governmental
agencies for their adoption as permanent rules, the chief information officer
shall submit the model rules and standards to the Utah Technology Commission
for its review and suggestions.
(d)  Nothing in this Subsection (3) requires a state agency to use the model
rules and standards prepared by the chief information officer when making
rules under this section.
(4)  Except as provided in Subsection 46-4-301(6), nothing in this chapter
requires any state governmental agency to:
(a)  conduct transactions by electronic means; or
(b)  use or permit the use of electronic records or electronic signatures.
(5)  Each state governmental agency shall:
(a)  establish record retention schedules for any electronic records created
or received in an electronic transaction according to the standards developed
by the Division of Archives under Subsection 63A-12-101(2)(e); and
(b)  obtain approval of those schedules from the State Records Committee as
required by Subsection 63G-2-502(1)(b).
